Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28B.50.465 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Academic employees of community and technical college districts shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section. ((For purposes of this section, "academic employee" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.52.020.))(a) ((Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each subsequent))Every fiscal year((, except as provided in (d) of this subsection,)) each college district shall receive a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to increase academic employee salaries, including mandatory salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index.(b) A college district shall distribute its cost-of-living allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and other compensation policies. No later than the end of the fiscal year, each college district shall certify to the college board that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for academic employees in subsequent years.(d) ((Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each subsequent fiscal year except for the 2013-2014 and 2014-2015 fiscal years, the))The state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase set forth in this section.(2) For the purposes of this section((, "cost)):(a) "Academic employee" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.52.020.(b) "Cost-of-living index" means, ((for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the cost-of-living index in this section))beginning with the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the implicit price deflator for the previous calendar year as of the beginning of the school year, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of economic analysis, United States department of commerce.Sec. 2. RCW 28B.50.468 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Classified employees of technical colleges shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section. ((For purposes of this section, "technical college" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.50.030.)) This section applies to only those classified employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW.(a) ((Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each subsequent))Every fiscal year((, except as provided in (d) of this subsection,)) each technical college board of trustees shall receive a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to increase classified employee salaries, including mandatory salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index.(b) A technical college board of trustees shall distribute its cost-of-living allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with the technical college's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and other compensation policies. No later than the end of the fiscal year, each technical college shall certify to the college board that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for technical college classified employees in subsequent years.(d) ((Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each subsequent fiscal year except for the 2013-2014 and 2014-2015 fiscal years, the))The state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase set forth in this section.(2) For the purposes of this section((, "cost)):(a) "Cost-of-living index" means, ((for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be used for the cost-of-living index in this section))beginning with the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the implicit price deflator for the previous calendar year as of the beginning of the school year, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of economic analysis, United States department of commerce.(b) "Technical college" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.50.030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2025.--- END ---